Tennessee, session 114, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The district attorneys general conference shall compile a yearly report detailing
convictions made pursuant to this part during the previous year. The report must be
provided to the general assembly no later than January 15, 2026, and each January 15
thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1172
002592
- 1 -